District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rodent Abatement Through Smart Solutions (RATSS) Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014, effective
February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding new sections 112g, 112h, and 112i to read as follows:
“Sec. 112g. Residential Rodent Prevention Trash Shed Incentive Program.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term “authorized retailer” means a retailer within
the District with which DPW has entered into a memorandum of agreement, as described in
subsection (g) of this section, to redeem applicants’ vouchers for a discount on the purchase price
of a rodent-proof waste container shed at the point of sale.


(b) There is established a Residential Rodent Prevention Trash Shed Incentive Program
(“Program”), to be administered by the Mayor, to provide rebates and vouchers to encourage
residential property owners and lessees to purchase and use a rodent-proof waste container shed.
“(c) To be eligible for a rebate provided for in this section, a residential property owner
or lessee shall:
“(1) After October 1, 2026, purchase a sealed shed structure to store trash and
recycling bins that is made out of rodent-proof materials, as designated by the Department of
Public Works;
“(2) Complete the training described in subsection (g) of this section; and
“(3) Submit a rebate claim to the Mayor in a manner to be determined by the
Mayor.
“(d)(1) Upon approval of a rebate claim submitted pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, the Program shall provide a rebate up to $300 per residential address; provided, that the
amount of the rebate shall not exceed the purchase price of the waste container shed.
“(2) Rebates shall be sent to the residential property owner or lessee within 30
days after the rebate claim is approved.
“(3) Rebates shall be contingent upon the availability of funds.
“(e) To be eligible for a voucher provided for in this section, a residential property owner
or lessee shall:
“(1) Complete the training described in subsection (g) of this section; and
“(2) Submit a voucher application to the Mayor in a manner to be determined by
the Mayor.

“(f)(1) Upon approval of a voucher application submitted pursuant to subsection (e) of
this section, the Program shall provide a voucher of up to $300 per residential address for a
rodent-proof waste container shed bought at an authorized retailer.
“(2) Vouchers shall be sent to the residential property owner or lessee within one
week after the voucher application is approved.
“(3) Vouchers shall be contingent upon the availability of funds.
“(g)(1) The Mayor, or a contractor selected by the Mayor, shall provide in-person or
remote, through videoconference or pre-recorded training video, training for District residents on
proper storage of trash cans and rodent prevention methods.
“(2) The Mayor may enter into a memorandum of agreement with a retailer
allowing the retailer to become an authorized retailer in the District.
“(A) To be eligible to serve as an authorized retailer, the retailer shall:
“(i) Have a physical retail location in the District as of the
applicability date of the Rodent Abatement Through Smart Solutions Amendment Act of 2025,
as introduced on DATE, 2025 (Bill 26-XXX); or
“(ii) Be eligible to be certified as a certified business enterprise, as
that term is defined in second 2302(1D) of the Small and Certified Business Enterprise
Development Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C.
Official Code § 2-218.02(1D)).
“Sec. 112h. Public litter container replacement.
“(a) The Department of Public Works (“DPW”) shall replace public litter containers
throughout the District in accordance with the process described in subsection (b) of this section.
“(b) Before replacing a public litter container, DPW shall:
“(1) Receive a request for replacement;

“(2) Confirm that the public litter container in need of replacement is
already serviced by DPW for trash and recycling collection;
“(3) Ensure the replacement container complies with rodent-proof trash
bin technology, including fullness sensors and fully sealed containers, as determined by DPW in
consultation with the D.C. Health Rodent and Vector Control Division;
“(4) If the conditions in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection are
satisfied, issue a written notice of intent to replace a public litter container to the Council and the
affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (“ANC”) and provide the Council and affected
ANCs 30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to respond; and
“(5) Give great weight to any comment from an affected ANC, pursuant to
section 13(d)(3)(A) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective March
26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10(d)(3)(A)).
Sec. 112i. Residential trash can replacement.
“(a) The Department of Public Works shall replace all waste with evidence of destruction
from rodents on a single block within the same timeframe.
“(b) The replacement shall prioritize:
“(1) Residential areas of the District which have had the highest calls to 311 for
rodent-related complaints;
“(2) Areas of the city where DPW has gotten the most requests for residential
waste container replacement;
“(3) Replacing residential waste containers in all 8 Wards; and
“(4) Areas with a high concentration of residential waste containers serviced by
DPW, rather than private collection.
“(c) DPW shall:

“(1) Inform the Advisory Neighborhood Commissioner for the Single Member
District for the block and residents on the block of when they will be replacing waste containers at
least 2 weeks prior; and
“(2) Inform the Advisory Neighborhood Commissioner for the Single Member
District for the block and residents on the block of how to indicate that their waste containers
need to be replaced.”.
Sec. 3. Title II of the Trash Compactor Tax Incentive Amendment Act of 2014, effective
March 11, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-223; D.C. Official Code § 8-751 et seq.), is revived as of the
applicability date of this act, and amended to read as follows:
100 “Sec. 201. Definitions.
101 “For the purposes of this section, the term:
102 “(1) “Business” means a single enterprise or a consortium of enterprises set up for
103 the common purpose of acquiring a commercial trash compactor for the use of each enterprise in
104 the consortium.
105 “(2) “Commercial trash compactor” means a structure used by businesses to
106 collect and compact bulk trash and other waste that is energy efficient and reduces the likelihood
107 of accidental pollution through spills or wind-blown debris.
108 “(3) “CTC Program” means the commercial trash compactor acquisition grant
109 program established by section 202.
110 “(4) “Grant Administration Act” means the Grant Administration Act of 2013,
111 effective December 24. 2012 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.).
112 “(5) “Grantee” means a business that meets the criteria and standards established
113 for the CTC program, as required by section 1094 of the Grant Administration Act and receives a
114 grant pursuant to this title.

115 “(6) “Grantor” means the Mayor or the Mayor’s delegate, including a District
116 agency, board, commission, instrumentality, or other program, or an individual within such an
117 entity.
118 “Sec. 202. Commercial trash compactor acquisition grant program.
119 “(a)(1) There is established a commercial trash compactor acquisition grant program to
120 financially assist a business or Main Street in the acquisition through purchase or lease of a
121 commercial trash compactor.
122 “(2) The CTC program shall be administered by the Mayor pursuant to the Grant
123 Administration Act; provided, that, notwithstanding section 1095(1) of the Grant Administration
124 act, the CTC program grant application process may be established with an open-ended closing,
125 allowing a business to apply for a grant and for the grantor, subject to subsection (b)(1) of this
126 section, to approve a grant at any time, in accordance with rules issued pursuant to this title or
127 the notice established pursuant to section 1094(c) of the Grant Administration Act.
128 “(b)(1)(A) A grant shall be awarded to eligible applicants in priority order of receipt of
129 the grant application to the extent that the funds allocated for this purpose in an approved annual
130 budget and financial plan or available pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph are
131 sufficient to allow the grant.
132 “(B) The Mayor shall make available no less than $2 million per fiscal
133 year for the CTC program grants.
134 “(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of D.C. Official Code § 47-368.06, grants
135 that may be awarded pursuant to this section may include grants that the Mayor or an agency
136 receives through an intra-District transfer, a memorandum of understanding, or a reprogramming
137 from an agency lacking grant-making authority.

138 “(c) Subject to subsection (b)(1) of this section, the grantor shall award a grantee a grant
139 in an amount:
140 “(1) Not to exceed $12,000 toward the leasing of a commercial trash compactor;
141 the amount to be based on terms and length of time in the lease; or
142 “(2) Not to exceed $36,000 for the purchase of a commercial trash compactor.
143 “(d) The Chief Financial Officer may audit the accounts of a business receiving a CTC
144 program grant up to 3 years following the issuance of the grant.
145 “Sec. 203. The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
146 Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
147 may issue rules to implement the provisions of this title.”.
148 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
149 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
150 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
151 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
152 Sec. 5. Effective date.
153 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
154 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
155 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
156 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).